Connecticut, session 2026, HB05235.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Removal" means the clearing of an encampment, or a portion
thereof, by the Department of Transportation or an agent or contractor
of the department and includes, but is not limited to, requiring persons
to vacate the property and collecting, relocating, discarding or disposing
of any structures or materials used for habitation and personal property;
(2) "Encampment" means any outdoor location where one or more
persons sleep, reside or store personal property using tents, tarps,
bedding or other temporary shelter or structures for the purposes of
habitation. "Encampment" does not include a campground or other
location that is designated or authorized for recreational camping by a
federal, state or municipal agency or by a private property owner and
where camping occurs; and
(3) "Personal property" means an item that can reasonably be
identified as belonging to a person, has apparent value or utility and is
not hazardous.
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5235
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, prior to the
removal of an encampment located upon any state highway right-of-
way or real property owned by the state and in the custody and control
of the Department of Transportation, the department shall provide at
least fourteen days' written notice that specifies the date and time such
removal will take place and that no person or personal property is
permitted to remain on the state highway right-of-way or real property
after such date. The department shall, at a minimum, post any such
notice at the apparent place of ingress and egress to the encampment
and at any apparent common area of the encampment. Such notice shall
be printed in English and Spanish. When posting such notice, the
department may provide oral or written notice to any person present at
the encampment.
(c) The notice required by subsection (b) of this section shall not be
required if the Commissioner of Transportation determines the removal
of an encampment is necessary to respond to any transportation
operations or infrastructure emergency or a public safety emergency.
The commissioner shall document, in writing, the reasons for such
determination.
Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, "removal",
"encampment" and "personal property" have the same meanings as
provided in section 1 of this act.
(b) The Commissioners of Transportation and Mental Health and
Addiction Services shall jointly study and make recommendations
regarding best practices and standards to adhere to when responding
to, managing or removing an encampment upon any state highway
right-of-way or real property owned by the state and in the custody and
control of the Department of Transportation.
(c) Such study shall, at a minimum, identify: (1) Best practices from
other states or municipalities regarding (A) the provision of advance
notices concerning the removal of an encampment to a person residing
at such encampment, including methods and reasonable timeframes for
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5235
providing such notices and the frequency of such notices, and (B) the
treatment of personal property during a removal of an encampment, (2)
procedures for outreach and engagement by trained personnel that
ensure respect for the personal dignity and property of persons at such
encampments, (3) appropriate state and local agencies to offer
immediate assistance and support to such persons for emergency
shelters, transitional housing or permanent housing, social services or
other interventions prior to and during the removal of an encampment,
(4) guidance, training or technical assistance that could be provided to
state and local agencies and municipalities regarding humane and
effective practices for responding to, managing and removing such
encampments, and (5) ways to ensure coordination with the
municipality where the encampment is located, community-based
organizations serving persons experiencing homelessness, local
housing authorities, other local service providers and the local law
enforcement agency, as appropriate, prior to the removal of an
encampment.
(d) Not later than January 15, 2027, the Commissioners of
Transportation and Mental Health and Addiction Services shall jointly
submit, in accordance with provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, the results of such study and any recommendations to the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to transportation.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3